Hawaii statutes.
§157-43 Construction. The license
required by this chapter shall be in addition to any other license required by
law. This chapter shall not be construed to affect in any manner the relations
between any cooperative marketing association and its members organized
pursuant to the laws of Hawaii or the United States. [L 1967, c 260, pt of §27;
HRS §157-43]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next